Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1795.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Payroll Bond Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Payroll processing service." Preparing and issuing payroll checks, preparing and filing Federal and State income withholding tax reports or unemployment contribution reports, or collecting, holding and turning over income withholding taxes to the department or Federal or local tax authorities as provided 1234567891011121314151617 under Federal and State law."Payroll processor." A person that provides a payroll processing service for one or more employers."Secretary." The Secretary of Revenue of the Commonwealth.Section 3. Proof of fidelity insurance.A payroll processor that issues payroll checks shall annually provide to the secretary proof of one of the following, at the payroll processor's option, in an amount two times the highest weekly payroll processed by the payroll processor in the preceding year or in the amount of $5,000,000, whichever is less:(1) fidelity bond;(2) employee dishonesty bond;(3) third-party fidelity coverage; or(4) liability insurance, including crime coverage.Section 4. Surety bonds.(a) Evidence.--Each payroll processor shall annually provide evidence of a surety bond, in a form approved by the secretary, in an amount equal to the total of all Federal, State and local tax payments and unemployment insurance premiums processed by the payroll processor on behalf of employers in this Commonwealth in the three-consecutive-month period of highest volume during the previous calendar year or $50,000, whichever is greater, but not to exceed $500,000.(b) Designation and use.--The bond shall designate the secretary as payee and the bond may be used for the purposes of the secretary and for the benefit of an employer who may have a cause of action against the payroll processor.(c) Terms.--The terms of the bond shall run continuously until canceled and the aggregate amount of the bond shall be 20250HB1795PN2208 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 maintained at all times while the payroll processor operates in this Commonwealth.(d) Notice by surety companies.--A surety company issuing a bond under this section shall immediately notify the secretary when that bond is canceled, terminates or lapses. The following shall apply:(1) The notice shall include the name and address of the payroll processor and the amount of the bond.(2) The cancellation, termination or lapse shall not be effective until at least 30 days after the secretary receives notice.Section 5. Penalty.(a) Fine.--A payroll processor which does not secure sufficient bonding and is found in violation of this act shall be fined $1,000 for the first offense and $5,000 for each subsequent offense.(b) Deposit of proceeds.--All fines or penalties collected under this act shall be paid into the State Treasury through the department and deposited into the General Fund.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1795PN2208 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021